Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 10.93 RCW to read as follows:(1) Whenever an on-duty general authority Washington peace officer or on-duty limited authority Washington peace officer encounters an individual the peace officer has reasonable suspicion is a federal agent conducting immigration enforcement activities, the peace officer shall:(a) Activate the peace officer's body worn camera if the peace officer is equipped with a body worn camera;(b) Activate the peace officer's dash camera if the peace officer is in the peace officer's official vehicle and if the vehicle is equipped with a dash camera;(c) Immediately report the encounter to the peace officer's employing agency so the agency may notify the community in a manner consistent with the agency's policies and procedures; and(d) After the encounter, document and report the encounter with the peace officer's employing agency.(2) When documenting and reporting activities under subsection (1) of this section, the peace officer shall attempt to:(a) Contact the reporting party, if any;(b) Confirm the identity of the individual the peace officer suspects is conducting immigration enforcement by requesting official identification, if safe and feasible; and(c) Refrain from taking actions that may escalate the situation.Â (3) The local government entity of which the peace officer is an employee, or the state, when the peace officer is a state employee, shall indemnify and hold harmless a peace officer in the amount of any judgment or fine levied against the peace officer, under RCW 4.96.041 or 4.24.490, in any civil or criminal proceeding arising from any actions taken by the peace officer in compliance with this section if the action was taken in good faith while the peace officer was acting within the peace officer's scope of employment.--- END ---